Nebraska, session 109, LB1127.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 37-438, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is amended
to read:
37-438 (1) The commission shall devise annual, temporary, hangtag,
disabled veteran, and active-duty military permits.
(2) The annual permit may be purchased by any person and shall be valid
through December 31 in the year for which the permit is issued. The fee for the
annual permit for a resident motor vehicle shall be not more than fifty dollars
per permit. The fee for the annual permit for a nonresident motor vehicle shall
be two times the fee for a resident motor vehicle. The commission shall
establish such fees by the adoption and promulgation of rules and regulations.
(3) A temporary permit may be purchased by any person and shall be valid
until noon of the day following the date of issue. The fee for the temporary
permit for a resident motor vehicle shall be not more than ten dollars. The fee
for the temporary permit for a nonresident motor vehicle shall be two times the
fee for a resident motor vehicle. The commission shall establish such fees by
the adoption and promulgation of rules and regulations. The commission may
issue temporary permits which are either valid for any area or valid for a
single area.
(4) Beginning January 1, 2027, an annual hangtag permit may be purchased
by any person with a resident motor vehicle. The fee for the hangtag permit
shall be the combined cost of one resident annual permit, one duplicate annual
permit, and a convenience fee. The hangtag permit shall be valid through
December 31 in the year for which the permit is issued and only for the vehicle
in which it is displayed. A hangtag permit issued pursuant to this subsection
may be transferred between motor vehicles registered by the permit holder in
the State of Nebraska. A hangtag permit shall not be reproduced or replaced if
lost or stolen. The commission shall establish a convenience fee for hangtag
permits that does not exceed fifteen dollars.
(5)(a) (4)(a) A veteran who is a resident of Nebraska shall, upon
application and without payment of any fee, be issued one disabled veteran
permit for a resident motor vehicle if the veteran:
(i) Was discharged or separated with a characterization of honorable or
general (under honorable conditions); and
(ii)(A) Is rated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs as
fifty percent or more disabled as a result of service in the armed forces of
the United States; or
(B) Is receiving a pension from the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs as a result of total and permanent disability, which disability was not
incurred in the line of duty in the military service.
(b) All disabled veteran permits issued pursuant to this subsection shall
be perpetual and shall become void only upon termination of eligibility as
provided in this subsection.
(6) (5) An active-duty military permit may be purchased by any individual
who is active-duty military and shall be valid through December 31 in the year
for which the permit is issued. The fee for the active-duty military permit is
five dollars, regardless of residency. To qualify for an active-duty military
permit, the individual shall present:
(a) Such individual's military identification card; and
(b) Proof that such individual is stationed at a military base located in
Nebraska for active-duty military service.
(7) (6) The commission may offer permits or combinations of permits at
temporarily reduced rates for specific events or during specified timeframes.
(8) (7) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this section.
Sec. 2. Section 37-440, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is amended to
read:
37-440 (1) The commission shall prescribe the type and design of permits.
Permits shall be: and the method for displaying permits on the driver's side of
the windshield of motor vehicles.
(a) Clearly visible from outside the vehicle;
(b) Except as provided in subdivision (1)(c) of this section, displayed by
affixing the permit upon the lower portion of the driver's side interior front
windshield of the motor vehicle; and
(c) For hangtag permits, displayed by being hung from the rearview mirror
or placed upon the front dash if no rearview mirror is present.
-1-

LB1127 LB1127
2026 2026
(2)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of this subsection, the (2)
The permits may be procured from the central and district offices of the
commission, at designated areas of the Nebraska state park system where
commission offices are maintained, from self-service vending stations at
designated park areas, from designated commission employees, through Internet
sales from the commission's website, from appropriate offices of county
government, and from various private persons, firms, or corporations designated
by the commission as permit agents. The commission and county offices or
private persons, firms, or corporations designated by the commission as permit
agents shall be entitled to collect and retain an issuing fee pursuant to
section 37-406.
(b) Hangtag permits may be procured from the central and district offices
of the commission and at designated areas of the Nebraska state park system.
Sec. 3. Section 37-443, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
37-443 It is unlawful for a motor vehicle to enter a permit area unless a
valid permit is displayed in or on the vehicle in the manner prescribed by the
commission. A permit shall be required for entry at any time of the year.
Except for hangtag permits, a A permit shall be nontransferable and valid only
for the motor vehicle for which issued. Any person who operates a motor vehicle
in violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor, and the
court shall order the confiscation of any permit purchased or used in violation
of this section. If the identity of the operator of a motor vehicle in
violation of this section cannot be determined, the owner or person in whose
name such vehicle is registered shall be held prima facie responsible for such
violation and shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.
Sec. 4. Original section 37-443, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
and sections 37-438 and 37-440, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are
repealed.
-2-